test/src/morphology/V-maeaeqdlw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - mǟ’dlõ: # Verb 60 'eng /est mäletada/fin' - full paradigm
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Inf: mǟ’dlõ
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Ger: mǟ’dlõs
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Sup: mǟ’dlõm
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Sup+Ine: mǟ’dlõmõs
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Sup+Ela: mǟ’dlõmõst
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Sup+Tra: mǟ’dlõmõks
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Sup+Abe: mǟ’dlõmõt
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mǟ’dlõb
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mǟ’dlõt
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mǟ’dlõbõd
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mǟ’dliz
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [mǟ’dlizt, mǟ’dliztõ]
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [mǟ’dlizt, mǟ’dliztõ]
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: mǟ’dlõ
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Cond+Sg3: mǟ’dlõks
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: mǟ’dõl
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: mǟ’dõl
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: mǟ’dlõgid
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Jus+Sg3: mǟ’dlõg
     mǟ’dlõ+V+Quo+Sg3: mǟ’dliji
     mǟ’dlõ+V+ActPrfPrc: mǟ’dlõn
     mǟ’dlõ+V+PssPrfPrc: mǟ’dõltõd
